Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1565XS (5) 91 as/ns S.F. 192 Section 1. Section 915.41, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. The cost of a medical examination of a victim for the 3 purpose of gathering evidence , the cost of the provision or 4 reimbursement of a victim for emergency contraception or other 5 health care treatment, including abortion, and the cost of 6 treatment of a victim for the purpose of preventing venereal 7 disease shall be paid from the fund established in section 8 915.94 . 9 Sec. 2. Section 915.94, subsection 1, unnumbered paragraph 10 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 11 A victim compensation fund is established as a separate fund 12 in the state treasury. Moneys deposited in the fund shall be 13 administered by the department and dedicated to and used are 14 appropriated to the department for the purposes of section 15 915.41 and this subchapter . In addition, the department may 16 use moneys from the fund are appropriated to the department for 17 any of the following purposes: 18 Sec. 3. Section 915.94, subsection 1, Code 2025, is amended 19 by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. The provision or reimbursement of a 21 victim of sexual assault for emergency contraception or other 22 health care treatment, including abortion. 23